nursery/apertium-eng-afr/apertium-eng-afr.afr.dix
    <pardef n="/'n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Other determiners -->

    <pardef n="genoeg__det">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="ander__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="baie__det">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="elke__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tweede__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>


    <pardef n="verskeie__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="my__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hierdie__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="miskien__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="waar__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wat__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoeveel__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="wat__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoe__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Preadverbs -->

    <pardef n="taamlik__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l> </l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- Adjektiven -->

    <pardef n="sy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pred"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="konfidensi/eel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eel</l>
          <r>eel<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ële</l>
          <r>eel<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pred"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ha/ar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pred"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ons__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>s'n</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pred"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dadelik__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="swart__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sigba/ar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ar</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>re</l>
	  <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="algeme/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>en</l>
	  <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="seksue/el__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>el</l>
	  <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mal__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vermoor__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>de</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="sleg__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>te</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oorbegro/ot__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ot</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>te</l>
	  <r>ot<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="se/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>re</l>
	  <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kwaa/d__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="wat"><i>wat</i><par n="wat__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hoeveel"><i>hoeveel</i><par n="hoeveel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="‘n" r="LR"><i>‘n</i><par n="/'n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ŉ" r="LR"><i>ŉ</i><par n="/'n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="’n"><i>’n</i><par n="/'n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sulke"><i>sulke</i><par n="ander__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ander"><i>ander</i><par n="ander__det"/></e>
    <e lm="enige"><i>enige</i><par n="ander__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mees"><i>mees</i><par n="baie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="meeste"><i>meeste</i><par n="baie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="geen"><i>geen</i><par n="elke__det"/></e>
    <e lm="’n ander"><i>’n<b/>ander</i><par n="elke__det"/></e>
    <e lm="enige"><i>enige</i><par n="elke__det"/></e>
    <e lm="wat"><i>wat</i><par n="wat__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="genoeg"><i>genoeg</i><par n="genoeg__det"/></e>
    <e lm="meeste van"><i>meeste<b/>van</i><par n="genoeg__det"/></e>
    <e lm="baie"><i>baie</i><par n="baie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="verskeie"><i>verskeie</i><par n="verskeie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="twee-en-dertigste"><i>twee-en-dertigste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="vier-en-sestigste"><i>vier-en-sestigste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ses-en-negentigste"><i>ses-en-negentigste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hierdie"><i>hierdie</i><par n="hierdie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sy"><i>sy</i><par n="my__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ons"><i>ons</i><par n="my__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jul"><i>hul</i><par n="my__det"/></e>
    <e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="sy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sy"><i>sy</i><par n="sy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jou"><i>jou</i><par n="sy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="haar"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hulle"><i>hulle</i><par n="ons__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="julle"><i>julle</i><par n="ons__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jul"><i>jul</i><par n="ons__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gedurende die somer"><i>gedurende<b/>die<b/>somer</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sommer"><i>sommer</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bloot"><i>bloot</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meer"><i>meer</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meeste"><i>meeste</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="só"><i>só</i><par n="taamlik__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="waar"><i>waar</i><par n="waar__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="toe"><i>toe</i><par n="hoe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hoe"><i>hoe</i><par n="hoe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hoekom"><i>hoekom</i><par n="hoe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Thai"><i>Thai</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="towenaar"><i>towena</i><par n="sigba/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="versoenbaar"><i>versoenba</i><par n="sigba/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="industrieel"><i>industri</i><par n="konfidensi/eel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="konfidensieel"><i>konfidensi</i><par n="konfidensi/eel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="seremonieel"><i>seremoni</i><par n="konfidensi/eel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spreekwoordelik"><i>spreekwoordelik</i><par n="dadelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekvlies"><i>dekvlies</i><par n="dadelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="termometries"><i>termometries</i><par n="dadelik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="volgende"><i>volgende</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="algemeen"><i>algeme</i><par n="algeme/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geïmpregneer"><i>geïmpregneer</i><par n="vermoor__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geproduseer"><i>geproduseer</i><par n="vermoor__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="interkonfessioneel"><i>interkonfessione</i><par n="seksue/el__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="professioneel"><i>professione</i><par n="seksue/el__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tekstueel"><i>tekstue</i><par n="seksue/el__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blykbaar"><i>blykba</i><par n="sigba/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="glorievol"><i>glorievol</i><par n="mal__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sinvol"><i>sinvol</i><par n="mal__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="saam"><i>saam</i><par n="swart__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beperk"><i>beperk</i><par n="sleg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="seer"><i>se</i><par n="se/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oorbegroot"><i>oorbegro</i><par n="oorbegro/ot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vloot"><i>vlo</i><par n="oorbegro/ot__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kwaad"><i>kwaa</i><par n="kwaa/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="smoorkwaad"><i>smoorkwaa</i><par n="kwaa/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bedek"><i>bedek</i><par n="sleg__adj"/></e>
